Alabama, session 2026rs, HB34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-10-9.2 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§13A-10-9.2
(a) A person commits the crime of giving false
information to a law enforcement officer if, during the course
of a law enforcement officer's official duties, the person
knowingly and with intent to deceive gives to the law
enforcement officer a false name, address, or date of birth.
(b) A violation of this section is a Class A
misdemeanor.
Section 2. Section 13A-10-3.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
13A-10-3.1
(a) A person commits the crime of refusing to give a
law enforcement officer information if all of the following
occur:
(1) A law enforcement officer, acting within his or her
official duties, develops a reasonable suspicion that a person
has committed, is committing, or is about to commit a felony
or misdemeanor and conducts an investigatory stop.
(2) The law enforcement officer reasonably identifies
himself or herself to the person as a duly sworn law
Page 2

himself or herself to the person as a duly sworn law
HB34 INTRODUCED
enforcement officer and provides the reason for the stop.
(3) The law enforcement officer asks the person for the
person's name, address, date of birth, or an explanation of
his or her actions.
(4) The person willfully refuses to answer the law
enforcement officer.
(b) Nothing in this section shall require a person to
give any information that would be deemed self-incriminating.
(c) A violation of this section is a Class C
misdemeanor.
Section 3. Section 15-5-30, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§15-5-30
A sheriff or other officer acting as sheriff, his
deputy or any constable, acting within their respective
counties, any marshal, deputy marshal or policeman of any
incorporated city or town within the limits of the county or
any highway patrolman or state trooperlaw enforcement officer,
acting in the course of his or her official duties, may stop
any person abroad in a public place whom hethe officer
reasonably suspects is committing, has committed, or is about
to commit a felony, misdemeanor, or other public offense and
may demand of himthat the person give his or her name,
address, date of birth, and an explanation of his or her
actions."
Section 4. Section 13A-9-18.1, Code of Alabama 1975,
relating to giving false information to a law enforcement
officer, is repealed.
Page 3

officer, is repealed.
HB34 INTRODUCED
Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4